Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-330
Corporations; excess payment; refund.

Any corporation which has paid occupation tax
in excess of the proper amount of the occupation tax imposed in sections 21-301
to 21-330 shall be entitled to
a refund of such excess payment. Claims for refund shall be filed with the
Secretary of State or may be submitted by the Secretary of State based on
his or her own investigation. If approved or submitted by the Secretary of
State, the claim shall be forwarded to the State Treasurer for payment from
the General Fund. The Secretary of State shall not refund any excess occupation tax payment if
five years have passed from the date of the excess payment.

Laws 1991, LB 829, § 25;

Laws 1992, Fourth Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 182, § 21;

Laws 2003, LB 524, § 15;

Laws 2006, LB 647, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 261.
January 1, 2016